District of Columbia statutes.
9-1219.01

Condemnation of materials for making or repairing public roads.

In any case where materials of any kind shall be deemed necessary for making or repairing a public road, if the proper authorities cannot agree with the owner as to their purchase, such materials may be condemned in the same manner as provided for in this chapter in cases of condemnation of land for the purposes of a public road.

History

R.S., D.C., § 267

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-331.
1973 Ed., § 7-332.